District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.60

Surety bond — Proof of financial responsibility.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 136, ch. 222, § 60
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491

History

1981 Ed., § 40-460.
1973 Ed., § 40-476.

Prior Codifications